Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-123.13
Farm winery; waiver of requirement;
when; conditions.

(1) If the operator of a farm winery is
unable to produce or purchase seventy-five percent of the grapes, fruit, or
other suitable agricultural products used in the farm winery from within the
state due to natural disaster which causes substantial loss to the Nebraska-grown
crop, such operator may petition the commission to waive the seventy-five-percent
requirement prescribed in section
53-103.13 for one year.

(2) It shall be within the discretion of the commission to waive the
seventy-five-percent requirement taking into consideration the availability
of products used in farm wineries in this area and the ability of such operator
to produce wine from products that are abundant within the state.

(3) If the operator of a farm winery is granted a waiver, any product
purchased as concentrated juice from grapes or other fruits from outside of
Nebraska, when reconstituted from concentrate, may not exceed in total volume
along with other products purchased the total percentage allowed by the waiver.

(4) Any product purchased under the waiver or as part of the twenty-five
percent of allowable product purchased that is not Nebraska-grown for the
production of wine shall not exceed the twenty-five percent volume allowed
under state law if made from concentrated grapes or other fruit, when reconstituted.
The concentrate shall not be reduced to less than twenty-two degrees Brix
in accordance with 27 C.F.R. 24.180.

Laws 1985, LB 279, § 6;

Laws 1986, LB 871, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 441, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 24;

Laws 1994, LB 859, § 5;

Laws 2004, LB 485, § 13;

Laws 2008, LB1103, § 3;

Laws 2010, LB861, § 54.